Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1142.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Statewide Recovery Fund (497) of the State Treasury, the sum of
Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to provide funding to the Boys and Girls Clubs in
Oklahoma. Such funds shall be utilized in a manner consistent with
the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee on Pandemic
Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of
Human Services, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
Statewide Recovery Fund (497) of the State Treasury, the sum of Six
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($600,000.00) or so much thereof as may be
necessary to provide funding to the Young Women’s Christian
Association (YWCA). Such funds shall be utilized in a manner
consistent with the recommendations adopted by the Joint Committee
on Pandemic Relief Funding on April 15, 2026.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1142 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 21st day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 27th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1142 Page 3